Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0311

Charitable, nonprofit organizations—Authorized gambling activities.

The legislature hereby authorizes bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles, amusement games, and fund-raising events, and to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs and to allow their premises and facilities to be used by only members, their guests, and members of a chapter or unit organized under the same state, regional, or national charter or constitution, to play social card games authorized by the commission, when licensed, conducted or operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

[ 1987 c 4 s 26. Formerly RCW 9.46.030(1).]